Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.1 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma


Computer Data Privacy Act".


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.2 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. "Aggregate consumer information" means information that


relates to a group or category of consumers from which individual

Req. No. 10067 Page 2


consumer identities have been removed and that is not linked or


reasonably linkable to a particular consumer or household, including


through a device. The term does not include one or more individual


consumer records that have been de-identified;


2. "Biometric information" means an individual's physiological,


biological or behavioral characteristics that can be used, alone or


in combination with other characteristics or other identifying data,


to establish the individual's identity. The term includes:


a. an image of an iris, retina, fingerprint, face, hand,


palm or vein pattern or a voice recording from which


an identifier template can be extracted such as a


faceprint, minutiae template or voiceprint,


b. keystroke patterns or rhythms,


c. gait patterns or rhythms, and


d. sleep, health or exercise data that contains


identifying information;


3. "Business" means a for-profit entity, including a sole


proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, corporation,


association or other legal entity that is organized or operated for


the profit or financial benefit of the entity's shareholders or


other owners, but does not include Internet service providers so


long as they are acting in their role as Internet service providers;


4. "Business purpose" means the use of personal information


for:

Req. No. 10067 Page 3


a. the following operational purposes of a business or


service provider, provided that the use of the


information is reasonably necessary and proportionate


to achieve the operational purpose for which the


information was collected or processed or another


operational purpose that is compatible with the


context in which the information was collected:


(1) auditing related to a current interaction with a


consumer and any concurrent transactions,


including counting ad impressions of unique


visitors, verifying the positioning and quality


of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with a


specification or other standards for ad


impressions,


(2) detecting a security incident, protecting against


malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal


activity, and prosecuting those responsible for


any illegal activity described by this division,


(3) identifying and repairing or removing errors that


impair the intended functionality of computer


hardware or software,


(4) using personal information in the short term or


for a transient use, provided that the


information is not:

Req. No. 10067 Page 4


(a) disclosed to a third party, and


(b) used to build a profile about a consumer or


alter an individual consumer's experience


outside of a current interaction with the


consumer, including the contextual


customization of an advertisement displayed


as part of the same interaction,


(5) performing a service on behalf of the business or


service provider, including:


(a) maintaining or servicing an account,


providing customer service, processing or


fulfilling an order or transaction,


verifying customer information, processing a


payment, providing financing, providing


advertising or marketing services, or


providing analytic services, or


(b) performing a service similar to a service


described by subdivision (a) of this


division on behalf of the business or


service provider,


(6) undertaking internal research for technological


development and demonstration,


(7) undertaking an activity to:



Req. No. 10067 Page 5


(a) verify or maintain the quality or safety of


a service or device that is owned by,


manufactured by, manufactured for or


controlled by the business, or


(b) improve, upgrade or enhance a service or


device described by subdivision (a) of this


division, or


(8) retention of employment data, or


b. another operational purpose for which notice is given


under this act, but specifically excepting cross-


context targeted advertising, unless the customer has


opted in to the same;


5. "Collect" means to buy, rent, gather, obtain, receive or


access the personal information of a consumer by any means,


including by actively or passively receiving the information from


the consumer or by observing the consumer's behavior;


6. "Commercial purpose" means a purpose that is intended to


result in a profit or other tangible benefit or the advancement of a


person's commercial or economic interests, such as by inducing


another person to buy, rent, lease, subscribe to, provide or


exchange products, goods, property, information or services or by


enabling or effecting, directly or indirectly, a commercial


transaction. The term does not include the purpose of engaging in



Req. No. 10067 Page 6


speech recognized by state or federal courts as noncommercial


speech, including political speech and journalism;


7. "Consumer" means an individual who is a resident of this


state;


8. "De-identified information" means information that cannot


reasonably identify, relate to, describe, be associated with, or be


linked to, directly or indirectly, a particular consumer;


9. "Device" means any physical object capable of connecting to


the Internet, directly or indirectly, or to another device;


10. "Genetic information" means any information, regardless of


its format, that concerns a consumer's genetic characteristics.


Genetic information includes, but is not limited to:


a. raw sequence data that result from sequencing of a


consumer's complete extracted or a portion of the


extracted DNA,


b. genotypic and phenotypic information that results from


analyzing the raw sequence data, and


c. self-reported health information that consumer submits


to a company regarding the consumer's health


conditions and that is used for scientific research or


product development and analyzed in connection with


the consumer's raw sequence data;


11. "Identifier" means data elements or other information that


alone or in conjunction with other information can be used to

Req. No. 10067 Page 7


identify a particular consumer, household or device that is linked


to a particular consumer or household;


12. "Internet service provider" means a person who provides a


mass-market retail service by wire or radio that provides the


capability to transmit data and to receive data from all or


substantially all Internet endpoints, including any capabilities


that are incidental to and enable the operations of the service,


excluding dial-up Internet access service;


13. "Person" means an individual, sole proprietorship, firm,


partnership, joint venture, syndicate, business trust, company,


corporation, limited liability company, association, committee and


any other organization or group of persons acting in concert;


14. "Personal information" means information that identifies,


relates to, describes, can be associated with or can reasonably be


linked to, directly or indirectly, a particular consumer or


household. The term includes the following categories of


information if the information identifies, relates to, describes,


can be associated with or can reasonably be linked to, directly or


indirectly, a particular consumer or household:


a. an identifier, including a real name, alias, mailing


address, account name, date of birth, driver license


number, unique identifier, Social Security number,


passport number, signature, telephone number or other



Req. No. 10067 Page 8


government-issued identification number, or other


similar identifier,


b. an online identifier, including an electronic mail


address or Internet Protocol address, or other similar


identifier,


c. a physical characteristic or description, including a


characteristic of a protected classification under


state or federal law,


d. commercial information, including:


(1) a record of personal property,


(2) a good or service purchased, obtained or


considered,


(3) an insurance policy number, or


(4) other purchasing or consuming histories or


tendencies,


e. biometric information and genetic information,


f. Internet or other electronic network activity


information, including:


(1) browsing or search history, and


(2) other information regarding a consumer's


interaction with an Internet website, application


or advertisement,


g. geolocation data,



Req. No. 10067 Page 9


h. audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory or other


similar information,


i. professional or employment-related information,


j. education information that is not publicly available


that includes personally identifiable information


under the federal Family Educational Rights and


Privacy Act of 1974,


k. financial information, including a financial


institution account number, credit or debit card


number, or password or access code associated with a


credit or debit card or bank account,


l. medical information,


m. health insurance information, or


n. inferences drawn from any of the information listed


under this paragraph to create a profile about a


consumer that reflects the consumer's preferences,


characteristics, psychological trends,


predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence,


abilities or aptitudes;


15. "Processing information" means performing any operation or


set of operations on personal data or on sets of personal data,


whether or not by automated means;


16. "Pseudonymize" or "pseudonymization" means the processing


of personal information in a manner that renders the personal

Req. No. 10067 Page 10


information no longer attributable to a specific consumer without


the use of additional information, provided that the additional


information is kept separately and is subject to technical and


organizational measures to ensure that the personal information is


not attributed to an identified or identifiable consumer;


17. "Publicly available information" means information that is


lawfully made available to the public from federal, state or local


government records or information received from widely distributed


media or by the consumer in the public domain. The term does not


include:


a. biometric information or genetic information of a


consumer collected by a business without the


consumer's knowledge or consent, or


b. de-identified or aggregate consumer information;


18. "Service provider" means a for-profit entity as described


by paragraph 3 of this section that processes information on behalf


of a business and to which the business discloses, for a business


purpose, a consumer's personal information under a written contract,


provided that the contract prohibits the entity receiving the


information from retaining, using or disclosing the information for


any purpose other than:


a. providing the services specified in the contract with


the business, or



Req. No. 10067 Page 11


b. for a purpose permitted by this act, including for a


commercial purpose other than providing those


specified services;


19. "Third party" means a person who is not:


a. a business to which this act applies that collects


personal information from consumers, or


b. a person to whom the business discloses, for a


business purpose, a consumer's personal information


under a written contract, provided that the contract:


(1) prohibits the person receiving the information


from:


(a) selling the information,


(b) retaining, using or disclosing the


information for any purpose other than


providing the services specified in the


contract, including for a commercial purpose


other than providing those services, and


(c) retaining, using or disclosing the


information outside of the direct business


relationship between the person and the


business, and


(2) includes a certification made by the person


receiving the personal information that the


person understands and will comply with the

Req. No. 10067 Page 12


prohibitions under division (1) of this


subparagraph;


20. "Unique identifier" means a persistent identifier that can


be used over time and across different services to recognize a


consumer, a custodial parent or guardian, or any minor children over


which the parent or guardian has custody, or a device that is linked


to those individuals. The term includes:


a. a device identifier,


b. an Internet Protocol address,


c. a cookie, beacon, pixel tag, mobile ad identifier or


similar technology,


d. a customer number, unique pseudonym or user alias,


e. a telephone number, and


f. another form of a persistent or probabilistic


identifier that can be used to identify a particular


consumer or device;


21. "Verifiable consumer request" means a request:


a. that is made by a consumer, a consumer on behalf of


the consumer's minor child, or a natural person or


person who is authorized by a consumer to act on the


consumer's behalf, and


b. that a business can reasonably verify, in accordance


with Section 19 of this act, was submitted by the



Req. No. 10067 Page 13


consumer about whom the business has collected


personal information; and


22. "Consent" means an act that clearly and conspicuously


communicates the individual's authorization of an act or practice


that is made in the absence of any mechanism in the user interface


that has the purpose or substantial effect of obscuring, subverting


or impairing decision-making or choice to obtain consent.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.3 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act applies only to:


1. A business that:


a. does business in this state,


b. collects consumers' personal information or has that


information collected on the business's behalf,


c. alone or in conjunction with others, determines the


purpose for and means of processing consumers'


personal information, and


d. satisfies one or more of the following thresholds:


(1) has annual gross revenue in an amount that


exceeds Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00),


(2) alone or in combination with others, annually


buys, sells or receives or shares for commercial


purposes the personal information of fifty

Req. No. 10067 Page 14


thousand or more consumers, households or


devices, or


(3) derives twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the


business's annual revenue from selling consumers'


personal information; and


2. An entity that controls or is controlled by a business


described by paragraph 1 of this subsection and that shares the same


or substantially similar brand name and/or common database for


consumers' personal information. For purposes of this paragraph,


"control" means the:


a. ownership of, or power to vote, more than fifty


percent (50%) of the outstanding shares of any class


of voting security of a business,


b. control in any manner over the election of a majority


of the directors or of individuals exercising similar


functions, or


c. power to exercise a controlling influence over the


management of a company.


B. For purposes of this act, a business sells a consumer's


personal information to another business or a third party if the


business sells, rents, discloses, disseminates, makes available,


transfers or otherwise communicates, orally, in writing, or by


electronic or other means, the information to the other business or


third party for monetary or other valuable consideration.

Req. No. 10067 Page 15


C. For purposes of this act, a business does not sell a


consumer's personal information if:


1. The consumer directs the business to intentionally disclose


the information or uses the business to intentionally interact with


a third party, provided that the third party does not sell the


information, unless that disclosure is consistent with this act; or


2. The business:


a. uses or shares an identifier of the consumer to alert


a third party that the consumer has opted out of the


sale of the information,


b. uses or shares with a service provider a consumer's


personal information that is necessary to perform a


business purpose if:


(1) the business provided notice that the information


is being used or shared in the business's terms


and conditions consistent with Sections 13 and 17


of this act, and


(2) the service provider does not further collect,


sell or use the information except as necessary


to perform the business purpose, or


c. transfers to a third party a consumer's personal


information as an asset that is part of a merger,


acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction in which


the third party assumes control of all or part of the

Req. No. 10067 Page 16


business, provided that information is used or shared


consistent with this act.


D. For purposes of paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section,


an intentional interaction occurs if the consumer does one or more


deliberate acts with the intent to interact with a third party.


Placing a cursor over, muting, pausing or closing online content


does not constitute a consumer's intent to interact with a third


party. Instead, said deliberate act must be consent to such


interaction as defined herein.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.4 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act does not apply to:


1. Publicly available information;


2. Medical information governed by state privacy health laws or


protected health information that is collected by a covered entity


or business associate governed by the privacy, security and data


breach notification rules issued by the United States Department of


Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code


of Federal Regulations, established pursuant to the federal Health


Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law


104-191) and the federal Health Information Technology for Economic


and Clinical Health Act, Title XIII of the federal American Recovery


and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5);

Req. No. 10067 Page 17


3. A provider of health care, or a health plan, governed by


state privacy health laws or a covered entity governed by the


privacy, security and data breach notification rules issued by the


United States Department of Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and


164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, established


pursuant to the federal Health Insurance Portability and


Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191), to the extent the


provider or covered entity maintains, uses and discloses patient


information in the same manner as medical information or protected


health information as described in paragraph 2 of this subsection;


4. A business associate of a covered entity governed by the


privacy, security and data breach notification rules issued by the


United States Department of Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and


164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, established


pursuant to the federal Health Insurance Portability and


Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal


Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act,


Title XIII of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of


2009 (Public Law 111-5), to the extent that the business associate


maintains, uses and discloses patient information in the same manner


as medical information or protected health information as described


in paragraph 2 of this subsection;


5. Information that meets both of the following conditions:



Req. No. 10067 Page 18


a. is de-identified in accordance with the requirements


for de-identification set forth in Section 164.514 of


Part 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal


Regulations, and


b. is derived from patient information that was


originally collected, created, transmitted or


maintained by an entity regulated by the Health


Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996


or the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human


Subjects, also known as the Common Rule.


Information that meets the requirements of subparagraph a or b


of this paragraph but is subsequently re-identified shall no longer


be eligible for the exemption in this paragraph and shall be subject


to applicable federal and state data privacy and security laws,


including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance Portability and


Accountability Act of 1996 and state medical privacy laws;


6. Information that is collected, used or disclosed in


research, as defined in Section 164.501 of Title 45 of the Code of


Federal Regulations, including, but not limited to, a clinical


trial, and that is conducted in accordance with applicable ethics,


confidentiality, privacy and security rules of Part 164 of Title 45


of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Federal Policy for the


Protection of Human Subjects, also known as the Common Rule, good


clinical practice guidelines issued by the International Council for

Req. No. 10067 Page 19


Harmonization, or human subject protection requirements of the


United States Food and Drug Administration;


7. The sale of personal information to or by a consumer


reporting agency if the information is to be:


a. reported in or used to generate a consumer report, as


defined by Section 1681a(d) of the Fair Credit


Reporting Act (15 U.S.C., Section 1681 et seq.), and


b. used solely for a purpose authorized under that act;


8. Personal information collected, processed, sold or disclosed


in accordance with:


a. the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999 (Public Law


106-102) and its implementing regulations, or


b. the federal Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994


(18 U.S.C., Section 2721 et seq.);


9. De-identified or aggregate consumer information; or


10. A consumer's personal information collected or sold by a


business, if every aspect of the collection or sale occurred wholly


outside of this state.


Provided further, nothing in this act shall be deemed to apply


in any manner to a financial institution or an affiliate of a


financial institution that is subject to the federal Gramm-Leach-


Bliley Act of 1999 and the rules promulgated thereunder.


B. For the purposes of this section, a business or other person


shall not re-identify, or attempt to re-identify, information that

Req. No. 10067 Page 20


has met the requirements of paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection A


of this section, except for one or more of the following purposes:


1. Treatment, payment or health care operations conducted by a


covered entity or business associate acting on behalf of, and at the


written direction of, the covered entity. For purposes of this


paragraph, "treatment", "payment", "health care operations" and


"covered entity" have the same meaning as defined in Section 164.501


of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and "business


associate" has the same meaning as defined in Section 160.103 of


Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations;


2. Public health activities or purposes as described in Section


164.512 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations;


3. Research, as defined in Section 164.501 of Title 45 of the


Code of Federal Regulations, that is conducted in accordance with


Part 46 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the


Federal Policy for the Protection of Human Subjects, also known as


the Common Rule;


4. Pursuant to a contract where the lawful holder of the de-


identified information expressly engages a person or entity to


attempt to re-identify the de-identified information in order to


conduct testing, analysis, or validation of de-identification, or


related statistical techniques, if the contract bans any other use


or disclosure of the re-identified information and requires the



Req. No. 10067 Page 21


return or destruction of the information that was re-identified upon


completion of the contract; and


5. If otherwise required by law.


C. In accordance with paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection A of


this section, information re-identified pursuant to this section


shall be subject to applicable federal and state data privacy and


security laws, including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance


Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and state health privacy


laws.


D. Beginning January 1, 2026, any contract for the sale or


license of de-identified information that has met the requirements


of paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection A of this section, where one


of the parties is a person residing or doing business in the state,


shall include the following, or substantially similar, provisions:


1. A statement that the de-identified information being sold or


licensed includes de-identified patient information;


2. A statement that re-identification, and attempted re-


identification, of the de-identified information by the purchaser or


licensee of the information is prohibited pursuant to this section;


and


3. A requirement that, unless otherwise required by law, the


purchaser or licensee of the de-identified information may not


further disclose the de-identified information to any third party



Req. No. 10067 Page 22


unless the third party is contractually bound by the same or


stricter restrictions and conditions.


E. For purposes of this section, "re-identify" means the


process of reversal of de-identification techniques, including, but


not limited to, the addition of specific pieces of information or


data elements that can, individually or in combination, be used to


uniquely identify an individual or usage.


F. For purposes of paragraph 10 of subsection A of this


section, the collection or sale of a consumer's personal information


occurs wholly outside of this state if:


1. The business collects that information while the consumer is


outside of this state;


2. No part of the sale of the information occurs in this state;


and


3. The business does not sell any personal information of the


consumer collected while the consumer is in this state.


G. For purposes of subsection F of this section, the collection


or sale of a consumer's personal information does not occur wholly


outside of this state if a business stores a consumer's personal


information, including on a device, when the consumer is in this


state and subsequently collects or sells that stored information


when the consumer and the information are outside of this state.


H. For purposes of this section, all of the following shall


apply:

Req. No. 10067 Page 23


1. "Business associate" has the same meaning as defined in


Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations;


2. "Covered entity" has the same meaning as defined in Section


160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations;


3. "Identifiable private information" has the same meaning as


defined in Section 46.102 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal


Regulations;


4. "Individually identifiable health information" has the same


meaning as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of


Federal Regulations;


5. "Medical information" means any individually identifiable


information, in electronic or physical form, in possession of or


derived from a provider of health care, health care service plan,


pharmaceutical company, or contractor regarding a patient's medical


history, mental or physical condition, or treatment;


6. "Patient information" means identifiable private


information, protected health information, individually identifiable


health information, or medical information;


7. "Protected health information" has the same meaning as


defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal


Regulations; and


8. "Provider of health care" means a person or entity that is a


covered entity.



Req. No. 10067 Page 24


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.5 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A right or obligation under this act does not apply to the


extent that the exercise of the right or performance of the


obligation infringes on a noncommercial activity of:


1. A publisher, editor, reporter or other person connected with


or employed by a newspaper, magazine or other publication of general


circulation, including a periodical, newsletter, pamphlet or report;


2. A radio or television station that holds a license issued by


the Federal Communications Commission;


3. A nonprofit that provides programing to radio or television


networks; or


4. An entity that provides an information service, including a


press association or wire service.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.6 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act does not:


1. Restrict a business's ability to:


a. comply with:


(1) applicable federal, state or local laws, or





Req. No. 10067 Page 25


(2) a civil, criminal or regulatory inquiry,


investigation, subpoena or summons by a federal,


state or local authority,


b. cooperate with a law enforcement agency concerning


conduct or activity that the business, a service


provider of the business or a third party reasonably


and in good faith believes may violate other


applicable federal, state or local laws,


c. pursue or defend against a legal claim,


d. detect a security incident; protect against malicious,


deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity; or


prosecute those responsible for any illegal activity


described by this paragraph, or


e. assist another party with any of the foregoing; or


2. Require a business to violate an evidentiary privilege under


federal or state law or prevent a business from disclosing to a


person covered by an evidentiary privilege the personal information


of a consumer as part of a privileged communication.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.7 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes


and to harmonize, to the extent possible, with other laws of this


state relating to the privacy or protection of personal information.

Req. No. 10067 Page 26


B. To the extent of a conflict between a provision of this act


and a provision of federal law, including a regulation or an


interpretation of federal law, federal law controls and conflicting


requirements or other provisions of this act do not apply. Further,


should the federal government pass comprehensive data privacy


regulations that conflict with the provisions herein, federal law


shall prevail.


C. To the extent of a conflict between a provision of this act


and another statute of this state with respect to the privacy or


protection of consumers' personal information, the provision of law


that affords the greatest privacy or protection to consumers


prevails.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.8 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act preempts and supersedes any ordinance, order or rule


adopted by a political subdivision of this state relating to the


collection or sale by a business of a consumer's personal


information.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.9 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Except as used in Section 4 of this act, for purposes of this


act, "research" means scientific, systematic study and observation,

Req. No. 10067 Page 27


including basic research or applied research that is in the public


interest and that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy


laws or studies conducted in the public interest in the area of


public health. Research with personal information that may have


been collected from a consumer in the course of the consumer's


interactions with a business's service or device for other purposes


must:


1. Be compatible with the business purpose for which the


personal information was collected;


2. Be subsequently pseudonymized and de-identified, or de-


identified and in the aggregate, such that the information cannot


reasonably identify, relate to, describe, be capable of being


associated with, or be linked, directly or indirectly, to a


particular consumer;


3. Be made subject to technical safeguards that prohibit re-


identification of the consumer to whom the information may pertain;


4. Be subject to business processes that specifically prohibit


re-identification of the information;


5. Be made subject to business processes to prevent inadvertent


release of de-identified information;


6. Be protected from any re-identification attempts;


7. Be used solely for research purposes that are compatible


with the context in which the personal information was collected;


8. Not be used for any commercial purpose; and

Req. No. 10067 Page 28


9. Be subjected by the business conducting the research to


additional security controls that limit access to the research data


to only those individuals in a business as are necessary to carry


out the research purpose.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.10 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A consumer is entitled to request that a business that


collects the consumer's personal information disclose to the


consumer the categories and specific items of personal information


the business has collected.


B. To receive the disclosure of information under subsection A


of this section, a consumer must submit to the business a verifiable


consumer request using a method designated by the business under


Section 18 of this act.


C. On receipt of a verifiable consumer request under this


section, a business shall disclose to the consumer in the time and


manner provided by Section 20 of this act:


1. Each enumerated category and item within each category of


personal information under paragraph 14 of Section 2 of this act


that the business collected about the consumer during the twelve


(12) months preceding the date of the request;


2. Each category of sources from which the information was


collected;

Req. No. 10067 Page 29


3. The business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling


the personal information; and


4. Each category of third parties with whom the business shares


the personal information.


D. This section does not require a business to:


1. Retain a consumer's personal information that was collected


for a one-time transaction if the information is not sold or


retained in the ordinary course of business; or


2. Re-identify or otherwise link any data that, in the ordinary


course of business, is not maintained in a manner that would be


considered personal information.


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.11 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A consumer is entitled to request that a business that


collects the consumer's personal information delete any personal


information the business has collected from the consumer by


submitting a verifiable consumer request using a method designated


by the business under Section 18 of this act.


B. Except as provided by subsection C of this section, on


receipt of a verifiable consumer request under this section, a


business shall delete from the business's records any personal


information collected from the consumer and direct a service


provider of the business to delete the information from the

Req. No. 10067 Page 30


provider's records in the time provided for in Section 20 of this


act.


C. A business or service provider of the business is not


required to comply with a verifiable consumer request received under


this section if the business or service provider needs to retain the


consumer's personal information to:


1. Complete the transaction for which the information was


collected;


2. Provide a good or service requested by the consumer in the


context of the ongoing business relationship between the business


and consumer;


3. Perform under a contract between the business and the


consumer;


4. Detect a security incident; protect against malicious,


deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity; or prosecute those


responsible for any illegal activity described by this paragraph;


5. Identify and repair or remove errors from computer hardware


or software that impair its intended functionality;


6. Exercise free speech or ensure the right of another consumer


to exercise the right of free speech or another right afforded by


law;


7. Comply with a court order or subpoena or other lawful


process; or



Req. No. 10067 Page 31


8. Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical or


statistical research that is in the public interest and that adheres


to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, provided that:


a. the business's deletion of the information is likely


to render impossible or seriously impair the


achievement of that research, and


b. the consumer has previously provided to the business


informed consent to retain the information for such


use.


D. Where a business, service provider or third party has made a


consumer's personal information public, said business, service


provider or third party shall:


1. Take all reasonable steps, including technical measures, to


erase the personal information that the business, service provider


or third party made public, taking into account available technology


and the cost of implementation; and


2. Advise any other business, service provider or third party


with whom a contract regarding the consumer exists that the consumer


has requested the erasure of any links to, copies of or replication


of that personal information.


SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.12 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 10067 Page 32


A. A consumer is entitled to request that a business that


sells, or discloses for a business purpose, the consumer's personal


information disclose to the consumer:


1. The categories of personal information the business


collected about the consumer;


2. The categories of personal information about the consumer


the business sold, or disclosed for a business purpose; and


3. The categories of third parties to whom the personal


information was sold or disclosed.


B. To receive the disclosure of information under subsection A


of this section, a consumer must submit to the business a verifiable


consumer request using a method designated by the business under


Section 18 of this act.


C. On receipt of a verifiable consumer request under this


section, a business shall disclose to the consumer in the time and


manner provided by Section 20 of this act:


1. Each enumerated category of personal information under


paragraph 14 of Section 2 of this act that the business collected


about the consumer during the twelve (12) months preceding the date


of the request;


2. The categories of third parties to whom the business sold


the consumer's personal information during the twelve (12) months


preceding the date of the request by reference to each enumerated



Req. No. 10067 Page 33


category of information under paragraph 14 of Section 2 of this act


sold to each third party; and


3. The categories of third parties to whom the business


disclosed for a business purpose the consumer's personal information


during the twelve (12) months preceding the date of the request by


reference to each enumerated category of information under paragraph


of Section 2 of this act disclosed to each third party.


D. A business shall provide the information described by


paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection C of this section in two separate


lists.


E. A business that did not sell, or disclose for a business


purpose, the consumer's personal information during the twelve (12)


months preceding the date of receiving the consumer's verifiable


consumer request under this section shall disclose that fact to the


consumer.


SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.13 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A consumer is entitled at any time to opt out of the sale of


the consumer's personal information by a business to third parties


by directing the business not to sell the information. A consumer


may authorize another person solely to opt out of the sale of the


consumer's personal information on the consumer's behalf. A



Req. No. 10067 Page 34


business shall comply with a direction not to sell that is received


under this subsection.


B. To exercise the right to opt out specified in subsection A


of this section, a consumer shall submit to the business a


verifiable consumer request using a method designated by the


business under Section 18 of this act.


C. A business that sells consumers' personal information to a


third party shall provide on the business's Internet website:


1. Notice to consumers that:


a. the information may be sold,


b. identifies the categories of persons to whom the


information will or could be sold, and


c. consumers have the right to opt in to the sale via


consent; and


2. A clear and conspicuous link that enables a consumer, or


person authorized by the consumer, to consent to the sale of the


consumer's personal information.


D. A business may not sell to a third party the personal


information of a consumer who does not consent to the sale of that


information after the effective date of this act or after a consumer


submits a verifiable request to opt out of any future sale.


E. A business may use any personal information collected from


the consumer in connection with the consumer's opting out under this


section solely to comply with this section.

Req. No. 10067 Page 35


F. A third party to whom a business has sold the personal


information of a consumer may not sell the information unless the


consumer receives explicit notice of the potential sale and is


provided the opportunity to, and in fact does, consent to the sale


as provided by this section.


G. A business may not require a consumer to create an account


with the business to opt in to the sale of the consumer's personal


information.


H. A business or service provider shall implement and maintain


reasonable security procedures and practices, including


administrative, physical and technical safeguards appropriate to the


nature of the information and the purposes for which the personal


information will be used, to protect consumers' personal information


from unauthorized use, disclosure, access, destruction or


modification, irrespective of whether a customer has consented to


opt in or out of a sale of data.


SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.14 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Legislature of the State of Oklahoma finds that


individuals within Oklahoma have a right to prohibit retention, use


or disclosure of their own personal data.


B. The Legislature of the State of Oklahoma further finds that


individuals within Oklahoma have previously been exploited for

Req. No. 10067 Page 36


monetary gain and manipulation by private ventures in utilization of


private data.


C. The Legislature of the State of Oklahoma further finds that


the protection of individuals within Oklahoma and their data is a


core governmental function in order to protect the health, safety


and welfare of individuals within Oklahoma.


D. The Legislature of the State of Oklahoma further finds that


the terms and conditions set forth in this act are the least


restrictive alternative necessary to protect individuals within


Oklahoma and their rights and that the use of a strictly "opt-out"


method for data privacy is ineffectual and poses an immediate risk


to the health, safety and welfare of individuals within Oklahoma.


SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.15 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A provision of a contract or other agreement that purports


to waive or limit a right, remedy or means of enforcement under this


act is contrary to public policy and is void.


B. This section does not prevent a consumer from:


1. Declining to request information from a business;


2. Declining to consent to a business's sale of the consumer's


personal information; or


3. Authorizing a business to sell the consumer's personal


information after previously opting out.

Req. No. 10067 Page 37


SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.16 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. After the effective date of this act, a business shall not


collect a consumer's personal information directly from the consumer


prior to notifying the consumer of each category of personal


information to be collected and for what purposes information will


be used, as well as obtaining the consumer's consent to opt in to


collection, which may be provided electronically by the consumer, to


collect a consumer's personal information.


B. A business may not collect an additional category of


personal information directly from the consumer or use personal


information collected for an additional purpose unless the business


provides notice to the consumer of the additional category or


purpose in accordance with subsection A of this section.


C. If a third party that assumes control of all or part of a


business as described by subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of subsection


C of Section 3 of this act materially alters the practices of the


business in how personal information is used or shared, and the


practices are materially inconsistent with a notice provided to a


consumer under subsection A or B of this section, the third party


must notify the consumer of the third party's new or changed


practices in a conspicuous manner that allows the consumer to easily



Req. No. 10067 Page 38


exercise a right provided under this act before the third-party


collector uses or shares the personal information.


D. Subsection C of this section does not authorize a business


to make a material, retroactive change or other change to a


business's privacy policy in a manner that would be a deceptive


trade practice actionable under Oklahoma law.


SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.17 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A business that collects, sells or for a business purpose


discloses a consumer's personal information shall disclose the


following information in the business's online privacy policy or


other notice of the business's policies:


1. A description of a consumer's rights under Sections 10, 11,


12, 13 and 16 of this act and designated methods for submitting a


verifiable consumer request under this act;


2. For a business that collects personal information about


consumers, a description of the consumer's right to request the


deletion of the consumer's personal information;


3. Separate lists containing the categories of consumers'


personal information described by paragraph 14 of Section 2 of this


act that, during the twelve (12) months preceding the date the


business updated the information as required by subsection C of this


section, the business:

Req. No. 10067 Page 39


a. collected,


b. sold, if applicable, or


c. disclosed for a business purpose, if applicable;


4. The categories of sources from which the information under


paragraph 3 of this subsection is collected;


5. The business or commercial purposes for collecting personal


information;


6. If the business does not sell consumers' personal


information or disclose the information for a business or commercial


purpose, a statement of that fact;


7. The categories of third parties to whom the business sells


or discloses personal information;


8. If the business sells consumers' personal information, the


Internet link required by subsection C of Section 13 of this act;


and


9. If applicable, the financial incentives offered to consumers


under Section 23 of this act.


B. If a business described by subsection A of this section does


not have an online privacy policy or other notice of the business's


policies, the business shall make the information required under


subsection A of this section available to consumers on the


business's Internet website or another website the business


maintains that is dedicated to consumers in this state.



Req. No. 10067 Page 40


C. A business must update the information required by


subsection A of this section at least once each year.


SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.18 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A business shall designate and make available to consumers,


in a form that is reasonably accessible, at least two methods for


submitting a verifiable consumer request for information required to


be disclosed or deleted under this act. The methods must include,


at a minimum:


1. A toll-free telephone number that a consumer may call to


submit the request; and


2. The business's Internet website at which the consumer may


submit the request.


B. The methods designated under subsection A of this section


may also include:


1. A mailing address;


2. An electronic mail address; or


3. Another Internet webpage or portal.


C. A business may not require a consumer to create an account


with the business to submit a verifiable consumer request.


SECTION 19. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.19 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 10067 Page 41


A. A business that receives a verifiable consumer request under


Section 10, 11, 12 or 13 of this act shall promptly take steps to


reasonably verify that:


1. The consumer who is the subject of the request is a consumer


about whom the business has collected, sold, or for a business


purpose disclosed personal information; and


2. The request is made by:


a. the consumer,


b. a consumer on behalf of the consumer's minor child, or


c. a person authorized to act on the consumer's behalf.


B. A business may use any personal information collected from


the consumer in connection with the business's verification of a


request under this section solely to verify the request.


C. A business that is unable to verify a consumer request under


this section is not required to comply with the request.


SECTION 20. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.20 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Not later than forty-five (45) days after the date a


business receives a verifiable consumer request under Section 10,


11, 12 or 13 of this act, the business shall disclose free of charge


to the consumer the information required to be disclosed under those


sections or take the requested actions, as applicable.



Req. No. 10067 Page 42


B. A business may extend the time in which to comply with


subsection A of this section once by an additional forty-five (45)


days if reasonably necessary or by an additional ninety (90) days


after taking into account the number and complexity of verifiable


consumer requests received by the business. A business that extends


the time in which to comply with subsection A of this section shall


notify the consumer of the extension and reason for the delay within


the period prescribed by that subsection.


C. The disclosure required by subsection A of this section


must:


1. Cover personal information collected, sold or disclosed for


a business purpose, as applicable, during the twelve (12) months


preceding the date the business receives the request; and


2. Be made in writing and delivered to the consumer:


a. by mail or electronically, at the consumer's option,


if the consumer does not have an account with the


business, or


b. through the consumer's account with the business.


D. An electronic disclosure under subsection C of this section


must be in a readily accessible format that allows the consumer to


electronically transmit the information to another person or entity.


E. A business is not required to make the disclosure required


by subsection A of this section to the same consumer more than once


in a twelve-month period.

Req. No. 10067 Page 43


F. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, if a


consumer's verifiable consumer request is manifestly baseless or


excessive, in particular because of repetitiveness, a business may


charge a reasonable fee after taking into account the administrative


costs of compliance or refusal to comply with the request. The


business has the burden of demonstrating that a request is


manifestly baseless or excessive.


G. A business that does not comply with a consumer's verifiable


consumer request under subsection A of this section shall notify the


consumer, within the time the business is required to respond to a


request under this section, of the reasons for the refusal and the


rights the consumer may have to appeal that decision.


SECTION 21. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.21 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A business that uses de-identified information may not re-


identify or attempt to re-identify a consumer who is the subject of


de-identified information without obtaining the consumer's consent


or authorization.


B. A business that uses de-identified information shall


implement:


1. Technical safeguards and business processes to prohibit re-


identification of the consumer to whom the information may pertain;


and

Req. No. 10067 Page 44


2. Business processes to prevent inadvertent release of de-


identified information.


C. This act may not be construed to require a business to re-


identify or otherwise link information that is not maintained in a


manner that would be considered personal information.


SECTION 22. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.22 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A business may not discriminate against a consumer because


the consumer exercised a right under this act, including by:


1. Denying a good or service to the consumer;


2. Charging the consumer a different price or rate for a good


or service, including denying the use of a discount or other benefit


or imposing a penalty;


3. Providing a different level or quality of a good or service


to the consumer; or


4. Suggesting that the consumer will be charged a different


price or rate for, or provided a different level or quality of, a


good or service.


B. This section does not prohibit a business from offering or


charging a consumer a different price or rate for a good or service,


or offering or providing to the consumer a different level or


quality of a good or service, if the difference is reasonably



Req. No. 10067 Page 45


related to the value provided to the consumer by the consumer's


data.


SECTION 23. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.23 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Subject to subsection B of this section, a business may


offer a financial incentive to a consumer, including a payment as


compensation, for the collection, sale or disclosure of the


consumer's personal information.


B. A business may enroll a customer in a financial incentive


program only if the business provides to the consumer a clear


description of the material terms of the program and obtains the


consumer's prior opt-in consent, which:


1. Contains a clear description of those material terms; and


2. May be revoked by the consumer at any time.


C. A business may not use financial incentive practices that


are unjust, unreasonable, coercive or usurious in nature.


SECTION 24. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.24 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A business may not divide a single transaction into more


than one transaction with the intent to avoid the requirements of


this act.



Req. No. 10067 Page 46


B. For purposes of this act, two or more substantially similar


or related transactions are considered a single transaction if the


transactions:


1. Are entered into contemporaneously; and


2. Have at least one common party.


C. A court shall disregard any intermediate transactions


conducted by a business with the intent to avoid the requirements of


this act, including the disclosure of information by a business to a


third party to avoid complying with the requirements under this act


applicable to a sale of the information.


SECTION 25. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.25 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A business shall ensure that each person responsible for


handling consumer inquiries about the business's privacy practices


or compliance with this act is informed of the requirements of this


act and of how to direct a consumer in exercising any of the rights


to which a consumer is entitled under this act.


SECTION 26. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.26 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person who violates this act is liable to this state for


injunctive relief and/or a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed:



Req. No. 10067 Page 47


1. Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each


violation; or


2. Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for each


violation, if the violation is intentional.


B. The Oklahoma Attorney General is entitled to recover


reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees, court costs


and investigatory costs, incurred in obtaining injunctive relief or


civil penalties, or both, under this section. Amounts collected


under this section shall be deposited in a dedicated account in the


General Revenue Fund and shall be appropriated only for the purposes


of the administration and enforcement of this act.


SECTION 27. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.27 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A business that discloses to a third party, or discloses for a


business purpose to a service provider, a consumer's personal


information in compliance with this act may not be held liable for a


violation of this act by the third party or service provider if the


business does not have actual knowledge or a reasonable belief that


the third party or service provider intends to violate this act.


SECTION 28. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901.28 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 10067 Page 48


A business's service provider may not be held liable for a


violation of this act by the business.


SECTION 29. This act shall become effective one (1) year after


enactment.




60-1-10067 MJ 11/18/24





































Req. No. 10067 Page 49